Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.140

Appeal.

An individual who has been disciplined, whose license has been denied, or whose license has been granted with conditions by a disciplining authority may appeal the decision as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2008 c 134 s 21; 1984 c 279 s 14.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—2008 c 134: See notes following RCW 18.130.020.